Washington statutes.
RCW 4.68.010

Summons after judgment.

When a judgment is recorded against one or more of several persons jointly indebted upon an obligation by proceeding as provided by the court by rule, such defendants who were not originally served with the summons, and did not appear to the action, may be summoned to show cause why they should not be bound by the judgment, in the same manner as though they had been originally served with the summons.

[ 1984 c 76 s 6; Code 1881 s 314; 1877 p 64 s 318; RRS s 436.]